California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(b) Every violation declared an infraction pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be punishable by (1) a fine not exceeding fifty dollars ($50) for a first
 violation; (2) a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) for a second violation of the same ordinance within one year; and (3) a fine not exceeding two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each additional violation of the same ordinance within one year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 412.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

12821.5.

(a) Whenever residential light, heat, or power is furnished through a submeter system by a master-meter customer for sale to users who are tenants of a mobilehome park, apartment building, or similar residential complex, the master-meter customer is responsible for maintenance and repair of its submeter facilities beyond the master meter, and nothing in this section requires a district to make repairs to or perform maintenance on the submeter system.

(b) Every master-meter customer shall provide an itemized billing of charges for light, heat, and power to each
 individual user generally in accordance with the form and content of bills of the district to its residential customers, including, but not limited to, the opening and closing readings for the meter, and the identification of all rates and quantities under the applicable rate structure. The master-meter customer shall charge each user of the service at a rate which does not exceed the rate which would be applicable if the user were receiving residential light, heat, or power directly from the district. The master-meter customer shall also post, in a conspicuous place, the applicable prevailing residential rate schedule, as published by the district.

(c) The district shall notify each master-meter customer of its responsibilities to its users under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 512, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12822.

(a) This section applies if there is a landlord-tenant relationship between the residential occupants and the owner, manager, or operator of the dwelling.

 (b) If a district furnishes individually metered residential light, heat, water, or power to residential occupants in a detached single-family dwelling, multiunit residential structure,
 mobilehome park, or permanent residential structure in a labor camp, as defined in Section 17008 of the Health and Safety Code, and the owner, manager, or operator of the dwelling, structure, or park is the customer of record of the service, the district shall make every good faith effort to inform the residential occupants, by means of written notice, when the account is in arrears, that service will be terminated in 10 days. The written notice shall further inform the residential occupants that they have the right to become customers of the district without being required to pay the amount due on the delinquent account. The notice shall be in English and in the languages listed in Section 1632 of the Civil Code.

(c) The district is not required to make service available to the residential occupants unless each residential occupant agrees to the terms and conditions of service, and meets the requirements of the district’s rules. However, if
 one or more of the residential occupants are willing and able to assume responsibility for the subsequent charges to the account to the satisfaction of the district, or if there is a physical means, legally available to the district, of selectively terminating service to those residential occupants who have not met the requirements of the district’s rules, the district shall make service available to the residential occupants who have met those requirements.

(d) If prior service for a period of time is a condition for establishing credit with the district, residence and proof of prompt payment of rent or other credit obligation acceptable to the district for that period of time is a satisfactory equivalent.

(e) Any residential occupant who becomes a customer of the district pursuant to this section whose periodic payments, such as rental payments, include charges for residential
 light, heat, water, or power, where these charges are not separately stated, may deduct from the periodic payment each payment period all reasonable charges paid to the district for those services during the preceding payment period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 560, Sec. 6.   (SB 120)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

12822.1.

(a) If a district furnishes residential light, heat, water, or power to residential occupants through a master meter in a multiunit residential structure, mobilehome park, or permanent residential structures in a labor camp, as defined in Section 17008 of the Health and Safety Code, and the owner, manager, or operator of the structure or park is listed by the district as the customer of record of the
 service, the district shall make every good faith effort to inform the residential occupants, by means of a written notice posted on the door of each residential unit at least 15 days prior to termination, when the account is in arrears, that service will be terminated on a date specified in the notice. If it is not reasonable or practicable to post the notice on the door of each residential unit, the district shall post two copies of the notice in each accessible common area and at each point of access to the structure or structures. The notice shall further inform the residential occupants that they have the right to become customers, to whom the service will then be billed, of the district without being required to pay the amount due on the delinquent account. The notice also shall specify, in plain language, what the residential occupants are required to do in order to prevent the termination or reestablish service; the estimated monthly cost of service; the title, address, and telephone number of a
 representative of the district who can assist the residential occupants in continuing service; and the address and telephone number of a legal services project, as defined in Section 6213 of the Business and Professions Code, which has been recommended by the local county bar association. The notice shall be in English and in the languages listed in Section 1632 of the Civil Code.

(b) The district is not required to make service available to the residential occupants unless each residential occupant or a representative of the residential occupants agrees to the terms and conditions of service, and meets the requirement of law and the district’s rules. However, if one or more of the residential occupants or the representative of the residential occupants are willing and able to assume responsibility for subsequent charges to the account to the satisfaction of the district, or if there is a physical means, legally available to the district, of
 selectively terminating service to those residential occupants who have not met the requirements of the district’s rules or for whom the representative of the residential occupants is not responsible, the district shall make service available to the residential occupants who have met those requirements or on whose behalf those requirements have been met.

(c) If prior service for a period of time, or other demonstration of credit worthiness is a condition for establishing credit with the district, residence and proof of prompt payment of rent or other credit obligation during that period of time acceptable to the district is a satisfactory equivalent.

(d) Any residential occupant who becomes a customer of the district pursuant to this section whose periodic payments, such as rental payments, include charges for residential light, heat, water, or power, where these charges are not
 separately stated, may deduct from the periodic payment each payment period all reasonable charges paid to the district for those services during the preceding payment period.

(e) If a district furnishes residential service subject to subdivision (a), the district may not terminate that service in any of the following situations:

(1) During the pendency of an investigation by the district of a customer dispute or complaint.

(2) If the customer has been granted an extension of the period for payment of a bill.

(3) For an indebtedness owed by the customer to any other public agency or when the obligation represented by the delinquent account or other indebtedness was incurred with any public agency other than the district.

(4) If a delinquent account relates to another property owned, managed, or operated by the customer.

(5) If a public health or building officer certifies that termination would result in a significant threat to the health or safety of the residential occupants or the public.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and in addition to any other remedy provided by law, if the owner, operator, or manager, by any act or omission, directs, permits, or fails to prevent a termination of service while any residential unit is occupied, the residential occupant or the representative of the residential occupants may commence an action for the recovery of all of the following:

(1) Reasonable costs and expenses incurred by the residential occupant or the
 representative of the residential occupants related to restoration of service.

(2) Actual damages related to the termination of service.

(3) Reasonable attorney’s fees of the residential occupants, the representative of the residential occupants, or each of them, incurred in the enforcement of this section, including, but not limited to, enforcement of a lien.

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and in addition to any other remedy provided by law, if the owner, manager, or operator, by any act or omission, directs, permits, or fails to prevent a termination of service while any residential unit receiving that service is occupied, the corporation may commence an action for the recovery of all of the following:

(1) Delinquent charges accruing
 prior to the expiration of the notice prescribed by subdivision (a).

(2) Reasonable costs incurred by the corporation related to the restoration of service.

(3) Reasonable attorney’s fees of the corporation incurred in the enforcement of this section or in the collection of delinquent charges, including, but not limited to, enforcement of a lien.

If the court finds that the owner, manager, or operator has paid the amount in arrears prior to termination, the court shall allow no recovery of any charges, costs, damages, expenses, or fees under this subdivision from the owner, manager, or operator.

An abstract of any money judgment entered pursuant to subdivision (f) or (g) shall be recorded pursuant to Section 697.310 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(h) No termination of service subject to this section may be effected without compliance with this section, and any service wrongfully terminated shall be restored without charge to the residential occupants or customer for the restoration of the service. In the event of a wrongful termination by the district, the district shall, in addition, be liable to the residential occupants or customer for actual damages resulting from the termination and for the costs of enforcement of this section, including, but not limited to, reasonable attorney’s fees, if the residential occupants or the representative of the residential occupants make a good faith effort to have the service continued without interruption.

(i) The district shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement this section and shall liberally construe this section to accomplish its purpose of ensuring that service to the
 residential occupants is not terminated due to nonpayment by the customer unless the district has made every reasonable effort to continue service to the residential occupants. The rules and regulations shall include, but are not limited to, guidelines for assistance to actual users in the enforcement of this section and requirements for the notice prescribed by subdivision (a), including, but not limited to, clear wording, large and boldface type, and comprehensive instructions to ensure full notice to the actual user.

(j) Nothing in this section broadens or restricts any authority of a local agency that existed prior to January 1, 1989, to adopt an ordinance protecting a residential occupant from the involuntary termination of residential public utility service.

(k) This section preempts any statute or ordinance permitting punitive damages against any owner, manager, or operator
 on account of an involuntary termination of residential public utility service or permitting the recovery of costs associated with the formation, maintenance, and termination of a tenant’s association.

(l) For purposes of this section, “representative of the residential occupants” does not include a tenants’ association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 560, Sec. 7.   (SB 120)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

12822.6.

(a) The decision of a district to require a new residential applicant to deposit a sum of money with the district prior to establishing an account and furnishing service shall be based solely upon the creditworthiness of the applicant as determined by the district.

(b) No municipal utility district owning or operating a public utility furnishing services for residential use to a tenant under an account established by the tenant shall seek to recover any charges or penalties
 for the furnishing of services to, or for the tenant’s residential use from, any subsequent tenant or the property owner due to nonpayment of charges by a previous tenant. For this purpose, the term “subsequent tenant” shall not include any adult person who lived at the residence during the period that the charges or penalties accrued. The district may collect a deposit from the tenant service applicant prior to establishing an account for the tenant. The district may not require that service to subsequent tenants be furnished on the account of the landlord or property owner unless the property owner voluntarily agrees to that requirement, nor may the district refuse to furnish services to a tenant in the tenant’s name based on the nonpayment of charges by a previous tenant.

(c) A district subject to this section may not demand or receive security in an amount that exceeds twice the estimated average periodic bill or three times the estimated
 average monthly bill.

(d) In the event of tenant nonpayment of all or a portion of the bill, the deposit shall be applied to the final bill issued when service is terminated.

(e) This section shall not apply to master-metered apartment buildings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 739, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

12823.

(a) A district furnishing its inhabitants with light, water, power, or heat shall not terminate residential service for nonpayment of a delinquent account unless the district first gives notice of the delinquency and impending termination, as provided in Section
 12823.1.

(b) A district shall not terminate residential service for nonpayment in any of the following situations:

(1) During the pendency of an investigation by the district of a customer dispute or complaint.

(2) When a customer has been granted an extension of the period for payment of a bill.

(3) On the certification of a licensed physician and surgeon that to do so will be life threatening to the customer and
 the customer is financially unable to pay for service within the normal payment period and is willing to enter into an amortization agreement with the district pursuant to subdivision (e) with respect to all charges that the customer is unable to pay before delinquency.

(c) A residential customer who has initiated a complaint or requested an investigation within five days of receiving a
 disputed bill, or who has, within 13 days of the mailing of the notice required by subdivision (a), made a request for an extension of the payment period of a bill asserted to be beyond the means of the customer to pay in full during the normal period for payment, shall be given an opportunity for review of the complaint, investigation, or request by a review manager of the district. The review shall include consideration of whether the customer shall be permitted to amortize the unpaid balance of the account over a reasonable period of time, generally within 12 months, but a district may
 grant a longer period of time if the district finds a longer period of time is necessary to avoid undue hardship to the customer based on the individual circumstances of the case. No termination of service shall be effected for any customer complying with an amortization agreement, if the customer also keeps the account current as charges accrue in each subsequent billing period.

(d) A customer whose complaint or request for an investigation pursuant to subdivision (c) has resulted in an adverse determination by the district may appeal the determination to the board.
 A
 subsequent appeal of the dispute or complaint to the board is not subject to this section.

(e) A customer meeting the requirements of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) shall, upon request, be permitted to amortize the unpaid balance of any bill asserted to be beyond the means of the customer to pay within the normal period for
 payment, generally within 12 months, but a district may grant a longer period if the district finds a longer period is necessary to avoid undue hardship to the customer based on the individual circumstances of the case.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 1000, Sec. 3.   (AB 178)   Effective September 30, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

12823.1.

(a) A district furnishing light, heat, water, or power shall not terminate residential service on account of nonpayment of a delinquent account unless the district first gives notice of the delinquency and impending termination, at least 10 days prior to the proposed termination, by means of a notice mailed, postage prepaid, to the customer to whom the service is billed not earlier than 19 days from the date of mailing the district’s bill for services, and the 10-day period shall not commence until five days after the mailing of the notice.

(b) Every district shall make a reasonable attempt to contact an adult person residing at the premises of the customer by telephone or personal contact, at least 24 hours prior to any
 termination of service, except that, whenever telephone or personal contact cannot be accomplished, the district shall give, by mail, in person, or by posting in a conspicuous location at the premises, a notice of termination of service, at least 48 hours prior to termination.

(c) Every district shall make available to its residential customers who are 65 years of age or older, or who are dependent adults as defined in Section 15610.23 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, a third-party notification service, whereby the district will attempt to notify a person designated by the customer to receive notification when the customer’s account is past due and subject to termination. The notification shall include information on what is required to prevent termination of service. The residential customer shall make a request for third-party notification on a form provided by the district, and shall include the written consent of the designated third
 party. The third-party notification does not obligate the third party to pay the overdue charges, nor shall it prevent or delay termination of service.

(d) Every notice of termination of service pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include all of the following information:

(1) The name and address of the customer whose account is delinquent.

(2) The amount of the delinquency.

(3) The date by which payment or arrangements for payment is required in order to avoid termination.

(4) The procedure by which the customer may initiate a complaint or request an investigation concerning service or charges, except that, if the bill for service contains a description of that procedure, the notice
 pursuant to subdivision (a) is not required to contain that information.

(5) The procedure by which the customer may request amortization of the unpaid charges.

(6) The procedure for the customer to obtain information on the availability of financial assistance, including private, local, state, or federal sources, if applicable.

(7) The telephone number of a representative of the district who can provide additional information or institute arrangements for payment.

Every notice of termination of service pursuant to subdivision (b) shall include the items of information in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (6), and (7).

All written notices shall be in a clear and legible format.

(e) If a residential customer fails to comply with an amortization agreement, the district shall not terminate service without giving notice to the customer at least 48 hours prior to termination of the conditions the customer is required to meet to avoid termination, but the notice does not entitle the customer to further investigation by the district.

(f) A termination of service shall not be effected without compliance with this section. Any service wrongfully terminated shall be restored without charge for the restoration of service, and a notation thereof shall be mailed to the customer at the customer’s billing address.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 251.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

12824.

No electrical, gas, heat, or water municipal utility district shall, by reason of delinquency in payment for any electric, gas, heat, or water services, cause cessation of any such services on any Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday, or at any time during which the business offices of the district are not open to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1027.)
-------------------------------------------

12825.

(a) A district furnishing light, heat, or power may engage in activities to reduce wasteful, uneconomical or unnecessary uses of energy, including, but not limited to, public information programs, the sale of insulation, the sale, rental and lease of materials or equipment for the purpose of conserving energy or reducing the need for the installation of electric generating facilities, and the adoption of voluntary and mandatory load management programs, and may also engage in activities to accelerate and participate in the development of alternative sources of energy including, but not limited to, the supply of equipment for use in connection therewith,
 and may do all things necessary or convenient to the full exercise of the powers herein granted. The interest rates charged on extended payment contracts for such materials or equipment shall not exceed that necessary to cover the district’s full cost of money plus its administrative costs and anticipated losses due to nonpayment on such contracts.

(b) This section does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, the existing law.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 12823 (as added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 14) by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

12826.

Every district shall comply with Section 8029.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 549, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

12827.

The board of a district that has owned and operated an electric distribution system for at least eight years and has a population of 250,000 or more may engage in programs to encourage economic development that benefits its ratepayers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 53, Sec. 2.   Effective April 26, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5a. Claims [12830. - 12830.]

12830.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1715.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Indebtedness [12841. - 12844.]

12841.

A district may borrow money and incur indebtedness, and may issue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness. No indebtedness shall be incurred exceeding the ordinary annual income and revenue of the district without the approval of two-thirds of the voters voting on the proposition to incur such indebtedness except as follows:

(a) A further vote of the voters is not required for any indebtedness heretofore or hereafter incurred within the purposes and not exceeding the available amount of any previously authorized bond issue, and as to such indebtedness the proceeds of any of the bonds unexpended in the
 treasury of the district, or the par value of any of the bonds which are unsold shall be deemed a part of the ordinary annual income and revenue of the district.

(b) Any district operating a utility under rules requiring applicants for extensions to advance the expenses of such extensions and facilities for serving additional territory may enter into agreements to refund to the applicants in a subsequent year the whole or any part of the expenses so advanced, and the refunds may be paid out of the revenues of subsequent years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 761.)
-------------------------------------------

12842.

No district shall incur an indebtedness for public works which in the aggregate exceeds 20 percent of the assessed value of all the real and personal property within the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12843.

Indebtedness which has been incurred for the construction and operation of a public utility, where the revenue from the utility for three years or more next preceding has been sufficient to pay the interest and principal due on any bonds issued for its construction or acquisition, in addition to the cost of operation and maintenance, shall not be counted and included in ascertaining the limit of indebtedness, and any indebtedness incurred for the acquisition, construction or operation of a public utility within any special district shall be excluded in ascertaining the aggregate indebtedness specified in Section 12842.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 210.)
-------------------------------------------

12844.

A district may accept, without limitation by any other provisions of this division requiring approval of indebtedness, contributions or loans from the United States, or any department, instrumentality, or agency thereof, for the purpose of financing the construction, maintenance, and operation of any enterprise in which the district is authorized to engage, and may enter into contracts and cooperate with, and accept cooperation from, the United States, or any department, instrumentality, or agency thereof, in the construction, maintenance, and operation, and in financing the construction, maintenance, and operation, of any such enterprise in accordance with any legislation
 which Congress may have heretofore adopted or may hereafter adopt, under which aid, assistance, and cooperation may be furnished by the United States in the construction, maintenance, and operation or in financing the construction, maintenance, and operation of any such enterprise. A district may do any and all things necessary in order to avail itself of such aid, assistance, and cooperation under any federal legislation now or hereafter enacted. Any evidence of indebtedness issued under this section shall constitute a negotiable instrument.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6a. Electric, Water, Communications, or Sewage Disposal System Improvements [12850. - 12857.]

12850.

This article shall apply only to districts which have owned and operated an electric distribution, water distribution, or sewage disposal system for at least eight years and which have a population of 250,000 or more.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

12851.

A district may, from time to time, issue bonds in accordance with the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), as it now reads or as hereafter amended, for the purpose of financing the construction, reconstruction, replacement, acquisition, or improvement of any facility or facilities necessary or convenient for the generation, transmission, or distribution of electricity; the storage, transmission, or distribution of water; the furnishing of communications services; or the disposal of sewage; or incidental to, or in connection with, the operation of the electric,
 water, communications, or sewage disposal system or facilities of the district, or for purposes of financing programs for the conservation of electricity, which shall constitute an “enterprise” within the meaning of Section 54309 of the Government Code. The authority hereby granted to the districts is in addition to all powers granted local agencies under the Revenue Bond Law of 1941, and Section 54310 of the Government Code, insofar as it is inconsistent with that authority, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 367, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12852.

Article 3 (commencing with Section 54380) of Chapter 6 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, the limitations on the rate of interest set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 54402 of the Government Code and on the discount set forth in Section 54418 of the Government Code, and the requirements for refunding revenue bonds set forth in Sections 53573, 53583, 54388, and 54661 of the Government Code do not apply to the issuance and sale of bonds pursuant to this article. Whenever a district proposes to exercise the power to issue bonds pursuant to this article, the board shall adopt a preliminary resolution
 declaring its intention to authorize the issuance of bonds, which resolution shall specify all of the following:

(a) The purpose for which the proposed bonds are to be issued.

(b) The maximum principal amount of the bonds then proposed to be issued.

(c) The maximum term for which any of the bonds are to run.

(d) The maximum rate of interest to be payable upon the bonds which rate shall be determined by the board.

(e) The maximum discount, which shall be determined by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 984, Sec. 1.   Effective September 11, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12853.

When bonds are issued under this article, the preliminary resolution of the board adopted pursuant to this article shall take effect upon its adoption by the board subject to the right of referendum provided for in this article. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized under this article from time to time and the authority herein contained shall not be limited to any particular issue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 916.)
-------------------------------------------

12854.

Upon any such resolution taking effect subject to the right of referendum pursuant to this article, the board shall cause the same to be published in the manner provided for the publication of notices. At any time within 60 days after the date of the second such publication a referendum petition, signed by voters in number equal to at least 3 percent of the total vote cast, as defined in Section 11507, demanding the submission of such resolution to a vote of the voters of the district for their assent to the issuance of the proposed bonds, may be filed with the secretary. Upon presentation to the secretary of a referendary petition, the resolution which is the subject thereof
 shall be of no effect unless and until it has been assented to by the voters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 916.)
-------------------------------------------

12855.

If no such referendary petition is presented within the period of 60 days, then upon the expiration of such period, or if the proposition of issuing the bonds specified in the resolution of the board adopted pursuant to this article has been assented to by a majority of the voters voting on the proposition, whether upon referendum or pursuant to Section 12856, then upon such proposition having been so assented to, the resolution shall take full and final effect, and the board may proceed in accordance with the provisions of this article and issue bonds within the terms of the resolution and in accordance with the applicable provisions of the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter
 6 (commencing with Section 54300), Part 1, Division 2, Title 5, Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 916.)
-------------------------------------------

12856.

The board at any time may, and upon the filing of a referendum petition as provided in Section 12854 shall, adopt a resolution calling a special election for the purpose of submitting to the voters of the district the proposition of issuing revenue bonds in conformity with the preliminary resolution adopted pursuant to Section 12852. The resolution calling the election shall fix the date on which the election is to be held, the proposition to be submitted thereat, the manner of holding the election and of voting for or against the proposition, and shall state that in all other particulars the election shall be held and the votes canvassed as provided by law for the holding of
 elections within the district. Such election may be held separately or may be consolidated with any other election authorized by law at which the voters of the district may vote. The resolution calling the election shall be published and no other notice of the election need be given. The votes of a majority of all the voters voting on the proposition at the election are required to authorize the issuance of revenue bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 916.)
-------------------------------------------

12857.

The authority herein contained shall be in addition to the authority conferred by Chapter 7 of this division and indebtedness incurred in accordance with the authority herein contained shall not be included in ascertaining the aggregate indebtedness specified in Section 12842.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 12852 by Stats. 1965, Ch. 916.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6b. Bonds [12860. - 12860.]

12860.

Bonds issued by a district, pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 53540) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, may bear interest at the rate or rates as may be fixed by the board of directors without regard to the limitations set forth in Section 53541 of the Government Code, and may be sold at a discount, as determined by the board of directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 394, Sec. 2.   Effective July 26, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Investments [12871. - 12875.]

12871.

A district may invest any surplus money in its treasury, including money in any sinking fund, in any of the following:

(a) Its own bonds, whether issued on behalf of the entire district or any special district.

(b) Treasury notes, certificates of indebtedness, bills, bonds of the United States, or any other evidence of indebtedness secured by the full faith and credit of the United States.

(c) Obligations issued pursuant to the Federal Home Loan Bank Act or the National Housing
 Act.

(d) Treasury notes or bonds of this state, or of any public corporation, municipal corporation, public district, or political subdivision within this state which are legal as security for the deposit of public funds.

(e) Obligations issued by federal intermediate credit banks, federal land banks, and banks for cooperatives.

(f) Obligations issued or assumed by the International Bank for Reconstruction and Development, the Tennessee Valley Authority, the Inter-American Development Bank, or Export-Import Bank of Washington participation certificates.

(g) Banker’s acceptances of banks having total deposits of one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000) or more.

(h) Any securities in which
 savings banks in this state may legally invest their funds pursuant to Sections 1350 to 1366, inclusive, of the Financial Code; provided, that the provisions of said sections limiting the amount which a savings bank may invest in securities to a specified percent of its paid-up capital and surplus, or savings deposits, shall not apply to investments authorized by the terms of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 926.)
-------------------------------------------

12872.

Such investment may be made by direct purchase of any issue of such bonds, treasury notes, or obligations, or part thereof, at the original sale or by the subsequent purchase of the bonds, treasury notes, or obligations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12873.

Any bonds, treasury notes, or obligations purchased and held as investments by the district may from time to time be sold and the proceeds reinvested in bonds, treasury notes, or obligations as provided in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12874.

Sales of any bonds, treasury notes, or obligations purchased and held by the district shall from time to time be made in season so that the proceeds may be applied to the purposes for which the money with which the bonds, treasury notes, or obligations were originally purchased was placed in the treasury of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12875.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a district which has owned and operated a water distribution or sewage disposal system for at least eight years and which has a population of 250,000 or more may enter into contracts commonly known as “interest rate swap agreements” or “forward payment conversion agreements” with any person providing for the exchange of payments between the person and the district including, without limitation, contracts providing for the exchange of fixed interest payments for floating payments or floating interest payments for fixed payments, or a combination thereof, after giving due consideration for
 the creditworthiness of the counter parties, where applicable, including any rating by a nationally recognized agency or such other criteria as may be appropriate. The contracts may be made upon the terms and conditions established by the board. The authority conferred by this section includes the authority to enter into any and all contracts incident to the exercise of the authority conferred by this section including, without limitation, contracts to obtain credit enhancement devices and contracts for the performance of professional services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1389, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Taxation [12891. - 12904.]

12891.

A district may levy, and collect or cause to be collected, taxes for any lawful purpose.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12891.5.
